Utah statutes.
77-27-29.   Rights of parolee or probationer -- Record of proceedings.
(1)  With respect to any hearing pursuant to the Uniform Act for Out-of-State
Supervision, the parolee or probationer shall have the following rights:
(a)  reasonable notice in writing of the nature and content of the allegations
to be made, including notice that its purpose is to determine whether there is
probable cause to believe that he has committed a violation that may lead to a
revocation of parole or probation;
(b)  be permitted to advise with any persons whose assistance he reasonably
desires, prior to the hearing;
(c)  to confront and examine any persons who have made allegations against
him, unless the hearing officer determines that such confrontation would
present a substantial present or subsequent danger of harm to such person or
persons; and
(d)  may admit, deny, or explain the violation alleged and may present proof,
including affidavits and other evidence, in support of his contentions.
(2)  A record of the proceedings shall be made and preserved.
